Nebraska, session 109, LB1039.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1039 LB1039
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 79-2704, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-2704 Each memorandum of understanding required by section 79-2703
shall govern the use of school resource officers or security guards and
shall include, but not be limited to, policies that:
(1) Require each school resource officer or security guard to attend
a minimum of twenty hours of training focused on school-based law
enforcement, including, but not limited to, coursework focused on school
law, student rights, understanding special needs students and students
with disabilities, conflict de-escalation techniques, ethics for school
resource officers, teenage brain development, adolescent behavior,
implicit bias training, diversity and cultural awareness, trauma-informed
responses, and preventing violence in school settings;
(2) Prohibit any school resource officer or security guard from
subjecting any student to corporal punishment as described in section
79-295.
(3) (2) Require a minimum of one administrator in each elementary or
secondary school where a school resource officer or security guard is
assigned to attend a minimum of twenty hours of training focused on
school-based law enforcement, including, but not limited to, coursework
focused on school law, student rights, understanding special needs
students and students with disabilities, conflict de-escalation
techniques, ethics for school resource officers and security guards,
teenage brain development, adolescent behavior, implicit bias training,
diversity and cultural awareness, trauma-informed responses, and
preventing violence in school settings;
(4) (3) Ensure records are kept on each student referral for
prosecution from a school resource officer in response to an incident
occurring at school, on school grounds, or at a school-sponsored event
and ensure that such records allow for analysis of related data and
delineate:
-2-

LB1039 LB1039
2026 2026
(a) The reason for such referral; and
(b) Federally identified demographic characteristics of such
student;
(5) (4) Identify school policies that address when a parent or
guardian will be notified or present, in a language that such parent or
guardian understands, if a student is subjected to questioning or
interrogation by a school official or by a school resource officer or
security guard operating in conjunction with a school official;
(6) (5) Identify the school or law enforcement agency policies that
address under what circumstances a student will be advised of
constitutional rights prior to being questioned or interrogated by a
school official or by a school resource officer or security guard
operating in conjunction with a school official;
(7) (6) Identify the school policy required by section 79-262 that
addresses the type or category of student conduct or actions that will be
referred to law enforcement for prosecution and the type of student
conduct or actions that will be resolved as a disciplinary matter by a
school official and not subject to referral to law enforcement; and
(8) (7) Identify a student and parent complaint process to express a
concern or file a complaint about a school resource officer or security
guard and the practices of such school resource officer or security guard
with the law enforcement agency or security agency.
Sec. 2. Original section 79-2704, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-